Virginia statutes. Title 23.1. Institutions of Higher Education; Other Educational and Cultural Institutions.
Chapter 16. James Madison University.

§ 23.1-1600.
Corporate name; name of the University.

The board of visitors of James Madison University (the board) is a corporation under the name and style of “The Visitors of James Madison University” and has, in addition to its other powers, all the corporate powers given to corporations by the provisions of Title 13.1 except those powers that are confined to corporations created pursuant to Title 13.1. The board shall at all times be under the control of the General Assembly.

The institution shall be known as James Madison University (the University).

All laws relating to Madison College or the board of visitors of Madison College shall be construed as relating to the University or the board, respectively.

History.

1964, c. 97, § 23-164.1; 1977, cc. 296, 319; 2016, c. 588.

§ 23.1-1601.
Membership.

The board shall consist of 15 members appointed by the Governor, of whom at least 13 shall be residents of the Commonwealth.

The alumni association of the University may submit to the Governor a list of at least three nominees for each vacancy on the board, whether the vacancy occurs by expiration of a term or otherwise. The Governor may appoint a member from the list of nominees. The Governor is not limited in his appointments to the individuals so nominated.

History.

1964, c. 97, §§ 23-164.3, 23-164.4; 1977, cc. 296, 319; 1979, c. 623; 1989, c. 107; 2016, c. 588.

§ 23.1-1602.
Powers and duties.

The board shall appoint all teachers and agents and fix their salaries and generally direct the affairs of the University.

The board may confer degrees.

History.

1964, c. 97, §§ 23-164.6, 23-164.8; 1977, cc. 296, 319; 2016, c. 588.

§ 23.1-1603.
Program of instruction to educate and train teachers.

The University shall maintain a program of instruction to educate and train teachers for the public elementary and secondary schools of the Commonwealth without excluding other programs of instruction.

History.

1964, c. 97, § 23-164.9; 1977, cc. 296, 319; 2016, c. 588.